Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 18
RECEIPT OF INFORMATION FROM THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
DURING A DECLARED DISASTER EMERGENCY

2-3-1801. Legislative committees to receive information from the executive branch during a declared disaster emergency - definition.

As used in this section, "committees" means the executive committee of the legislative council created in section 2-3-301 (1) and the joint budget committee created in section 2-3-201, or any successor committees.

Each year, the committees shall hold a joint meeting during the months of March, August, and December if there has been a declaration of a disaster emergency by the governor under section 24-33.5-704 (4), or any successor section, since the first day of the month for the last required meeting. With respect to any joint meeting of the committees, the requirement to meet may be waived if such waiver is submitted in writing by not less than a majority of the membership of the committees.

During any joint meeting of the committees held in accordance with this part 18, the governor or his or her designee shall appear to provide information of a comprehensive nature and respond to questions from the committees with respect to a current disaster emergency.

The governor and any state agency shall promptly give notice to the general assembly of the promulgation of any executive order or other order by the governor or the agency, as applicable, issued in connection with the disaster emergency.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire part added, (HB 20-1426), ch. 306, p. 1556, § 1, effective July 14.